Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.060

Course of study and regulations—Enforcement—Withholding salary warrant for failure.

Certificated employees shall faithfully enforce in the common schools the course of study and regulations prescribed, whether regulations of the district, the superintendent of public instruction, or the state board of education, and shall furnish promptly all information relating to the common schools which may be requested by the educational service district superintendent.

Any certificated employee who wilfully refuses or neglects to enforce the course of study or the rules and regulations as above in this section required, shall not be allowed by the directors any warrant for salary due until said person shall have complied with said requirements.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 132; 1971 c 48 s 49; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.060. Prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 307 s 4; RRS s 4850; prior: 1899 c 142 s 11; 1897 c 118 s 54; 1886 p 18 s 47. Formerly RCW 28.67.060. (ii) 1909 c 97 p 360 s 8; RRS s 5051; prior: 1903 c 156 s 8; 1897 c 118 s 166. Formerly RCW 28A.67.060, 28.87.150.]